Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.250

Toll-free media and web page.

The secretary of state shall provide a toll-free media and web page designed to allow voter communication with the office of the secretary of state.

[ 2003 c 111 s 141. Prior: 2001 c 41 s 5. Formerly RCW 29.04.091.]